Hawaii statutes.
§460J-21 Fumigation under supervision.
Fumigation shall be performed only under the direct supervision of an
individual who is an applicator certified for structural fumigation by the
department of agriculture. [L 1972, c 134, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 74, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next